Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.715.040

Student enrollment reporting—Funding apportionment and allocations—Retention of moneys in accounts.

(1) A school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact must report student enrollment. Reporting must be done in the same manner and use the same definitions of enrolled students and annual average full-time equivalent enrollment as is required of school districts. The reporting requirements in this subsection are required for a school to receive state or federal funding that is allocated based on student characteristics.

(2) Funding for a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact shall be apportioned by the superintendent of public instruction according to the schedule established under RCW 28A.510.250, including general apportionment, special education, categorical, and other nonbasic education moneys. Allocations for certificated instructional staff must be based on the statewide average salary set forth in RCW 28A.150.410, adjusted by the regionalization factor that applies to the school district in which the school is located. Allocations for classified staff and certificated administrative staff must be based on the salary allocations of the school district in which the school is located as set forth in RCW 28A.150.410, adjusted by the regionalization factor that applies to the school district in which the school is located. Nothing in this section requires a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact to use the statewide salary allocation schedule. Such a school is eligible to apply for state grants on the same basis as a school district.

(3) Any moneys received by a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact from any source that remain in the school's accounts at the end of any budget year must remain in the school's accounts for use by the school during subsequent budget years.

[ 2018 c 266 s 404; 2013 c 242 s 5.]